Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin OUR SAVIOUR'S COMMUNITY SERVICES; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Our Saviour's Community Services, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, to design, construct, furnish, and equip an expansion and renovation of their current facilities in the city of Minneapolis, including a new multiuse building to house 40 permanent supportive housing units, a school for immigrant adult English learners (English Learning Center), offices for staff, and a geothermal system. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end